src/fst/morphology/stems/adpositions.lexc
LEXICON Prepositions !!≈ **@CODE@**

!!! SEE PART-LEX.TXT for Part Inf
!!!a+Prep+Inf:a					#; 	! (síol) a chur, to sow (a seed)

!! SIMPLE PREPOSITIONS
!
!!!a+Prep+Simp:a					#; 	! 
a+Prep+Simp+NG:dh'					#; 	! 
<a 0:%  0:d 0:h 0:' %+Prep:0 %+Simp:0>		#; 	! a dh' = a
ag+Prep+Simp:ag					#;	! at
ag+Prep+Simp+NG:a'					#;	! at
ag+CM+Prep+Simp+NG:age				#;	! at (Munster)
amhail+Prep+Simp:amhail					#;  ! like, as
ar+Prep+Simp:ar					#;  ! on
as+Prep+Simp:as					#;  ! out
chuig+Prep+Simp:chuig			#;  ! to
chun+Prep+Simp:chun				#;
cois+Prep+Simp:cois				#;  ! 
dála+Prep+Simp:dára				#;  !
dar+Prep+Simp:dar				#;  ! by, dar fia, dar m'focal
de+Prep+Simp:de					#;  ! from/of`
de+CM+Prep+Simp:des					#;  ! from/of
de+Prep+Simp+Len+NG:dhe					#;  ! from/of
de+Prep+Simp+NG:d'					#;  ! from (before vowel)
do+Prep+Simp:do					#;  ! to
do+Prep+Simp+Len:dho				#;  ! to
do+Prep+Simp+NG:d'					#;  ! to (before vowel)
do+Prep+Simp+NG:dos				#;  ! to (before na )
faoi+Prep+Simp:faoi				#;  !
faoi+Prep+Simp+NG:fé				#;  ! CANÚINT/VARIANT
fara+Prep+Simp:fara				#;  ! as well as 
fearacht+Prep+Simp:fearacht		#;  !
gan+Prep+Simp:gan				#;
ach+Prep+Simp:ach				#;  ! Níl ann ach(@PP_NEG) spórt
go+Prep+Simp:go					#;
!! theses are not preps only copula or conj
!!gur+Prep+Simp:gur				#;
!!gurb+Prep+Simp:gurb				#;
!!gurbh+Prep+Simp:gurbh			#;
i+Prep+Simp:i					#;  ! in
i+Prep+Simp:I					#;  ! in
iar+Prep+Simp:iar				#;  ! iar
i+Prep+Simp+Vow:in					#;  ! in (before a vowel)
trí+Prep+Simp:trín				#;  ! trí (before a vowel)
i+Prep+Det+Poss+1P+Sg:im			#;  ! i mo
idir+Prep+Simp:idir				#;  ! between
idir+Prep+Simp:eadar				#;  ! between
ionsar+Prep+Simp:ionsar			#;  ! towards
!! this "is" looks like "agus" to me ... removing the prep reading ...
!!is+Prep+Simp:is				#;! bliain is an t-am seo
le+Prep+Simp:le					#;  ! with
le+Prep+Simp:len				#;	! with (before  Poss Det a)
le+Prep+Simp+DefArt:leis			#;	! with (before article)
mar+Prep+Simp:mar				#;	! like, as
ó+Prep+Simp:ó					#;  ! from
ó+Prep+Simp:Ó					#;  ! from
ó+Prep+Simp:o					#;  ! from (mispelling)
os+Prep+Simp:os					#;  ! 
roimh+Prep+Simp:roimh			#;  ! from
seachas+Prep+Simp:seachas		#;  ! 
seach+Prep+Simp:seach			#;  ! other than
thar+Prep+Simp:tar				#;  ! tar (éis)
thar+Prep+Simp:thar				#;  ! over
timpeall+Prep+Simp:timpeall		#;  !
trasna+Prep+Simp:trasna			#;  !
trí+Prep+Simp:trí				#;  ! through
trí+Prep+Simp:tré				#;  ! through
trí+Prep+Simp:tríd				#;  ! through
trí+Prep+Simp:fríd				#;  ! through
um+Prep+Simp:um					#;
um+Prep+Simp:uim					#;
!! should be subst except in Prep Cmpd - see below : maidir+Prep+Simp:maidir			#;
!! should be subst:  maille+Prep+Simp:maille			#; ! maille le = along with


!
! The 7 simple prepositions ending in a vowel (de, do, faoi, i, le, ó, trí)
! participate in compounds 
! ALSO GO ???

!! COMPOUNDS: PREP + ARTICLE (an/na)
! 

de+Prep+Art+Sg:den				#;  ! from the
de+Prep+Art+Sg+Len:dhen				#;  ! from the
de+Prep+Art+Pl:dena				#;  ! from the(pl)

do+Prep+Art+Sg:don				#;  ! to the (sg)
do+Prep+Art+Sg+Len:dhon				#;  ! to the (sg)
do+Prep+Art+Sg:Don				#;  ! to the (sg)

faoi+Prep+Art+Sg:faoin			#;	! under the
faoi+Prep+Art+Sg+NG:fén			#;	! under the: CANÚINT/VARIANT
faoi+CU+Prep+Art+Sg+NG:fán			#;	! under the: CANÚINT/VARIANT

i+Prep+Art+Sg:ins				#;	! in
i+Prep+Art+Sg:insa				#;	! in (Added CW 04/09/08)
i+Prep+Art+Sg:insan				#;	! in (Added CW 04/09/08)
i+Prep+Art+Sg+SA:sa				#;	! in
i+Prep+Art+Sg+Vow:san				#;	! in the (sg)
i+Prep+Art+Sg+SAN:San				#;	! in the (sg)
i+Prep+Art+Pl+Noun:sna				#;	! in the (pl)

!! le does not combine with art: but becomes leis before "an"

ó+Prep+Art+Sg:ón				#;	! from the

!! trí does not combine with art: but becomes tríd before "an"

!! Hisrorical forms (bardic)
ag+Prep+Art+Sg:ag_an				#;  ! agan -> ag_an Historical form
ar+Prep+Art+Sg:ar_an				#;  ! asan -> ar_an Historical form
as+Prep+Art+Sg:as_an				#;  ! asin -> as_an Historical form
feadh+Prep+Art+Sg:feadh_an			#;  ! fan -> feadh_an Historical form
um+Prep+Art+Sg:um_an				#;  ! mun -> um_an Historical form
de+Prep+Art+Pl:de_na				#;  ! dena and many other forms  -> de_na Historical form

!! COMPOUNDS: PREP + POSS PRON (a/ár)
!
de+Prep+Deg:dá			#; ! de + a (degree) "dá airde an sliabh..."
de+Prep+Rel:dá			#; ! de + a (rel) "dá dtagraíter..." to which

de+Prep+Poss+3P+Pl:dá			#; ! de + a "dá chairde"
de+Prep+Poss+3P+Sg+Fem:dá		#; ! de + a "dá cairde"
de+Prep+Poss+3P+Sg+Masc:dá		#; ! de + a "dá gcairde"
de+Prep+Poss+1P+Pl:dár			#;

do+Prep+Poss+2P+Sg+NG:dod			#; ! do do chairde
do+Prep+Poss+2P+Sg+NG:dod'			#; ! do do chairde
do+Prep+Poss+3P+Sg+Fem:dá			#;
do+Prep+Poss+3P+Sg+Masc:dá			#;
do+Prep+Poss+3P+Pl:dá			#;
do+Prep+Poss+3P:dhá			#;
do+Prep+Poss+1P+Pl:dár			#;

! SEE PRON-LEX
do+Prep+Poss+3P+Sg+Fem+Obj:á			#; ! bhí siad á mbualadh 
do+Prep+Poss+3P+Sg+Masc+Obj:á		#;
do+Prep+Poss+3P+Pl+Obj:á			#;

faoi+Prep+Poss+3P+Sg+Fem:faoina		#;  ! under his/her/their
faoi+Prep+Poss+3P+Sg+Fem+NG:féna		#;  ! under his/her/their
faoi+Prep+Poss+3P+Sg+Fem+NG:fána		#;  ! under his/her/their
faoi+Prep+Poss+3P+Sg+Masc:faoina		#;  ! under his/her/their
faoi+Prep+Poss+3P+Sg+Masc+NG:féna		#;  ! under his/her/their
faoi+Prep+Poss+3P+Sg+Masc+NG:fána		#;  ! under his/her/their
faoi+Prep+Poss+3P+Pl:faoina		#;  ! under his/her/their
faoi+Prep+Poss+3P+Pl+NG:féna		#;  ! under his/her/their
faoi+Prep+Poss+3P+Pl+NG:fána		#;  ! under his/her/their
faoi+Prep+Poss+1P+Pl:faoinár		#;  ! under ours
faoi+Prep+Poss+1P+Pl+NG:fénár		#;  ! under ours

i+Prep+Poss+3P+Sg+Fem:ina		#;  ! e.g. ina láimh
i+Prep+Poss+3P+Sg+Fem+NG:'na		#;  ! e.g. 'na láimh
i+Prep+Poss+3P+Sg+Masc:ina		#;  ! e.g. ina láimh
i+Prep+Poss+3P+Sg+Masc+NG:'na		#;  ! 
i+Prep+Poss+3P+Pl:ina			#;  ! e.g. ina láimh
i+Prep+Poss+3P+Pl+NG:'na		#;  ! e.g. 
i+Prep+Poss+1P+Pl:inár			#;  !

le+Prep+Poss+1P+Sg+NG:lem			#;  ! with my
le+Prep+Poss+1P+Sg+NG:lem'			#;  ! with my
le+Prep+Poss+3P+Sg+Fem:lena			#;  ! with her/his/their
le+Prep+Poss+3P+Sg+Masc:lena			#;  ! with her/his/their
le+Prep+Poss+3P+Pl:lena			#;  ! with her/his/their
le+Prep+Poss+1P+Pl:lenár			#;  ! with our
	
ó+Prep+Poss+3P+Pl:óna			#;  !
ó+Prep+Poss+3P+Pl+NG:'na			#;  !
ó+Prep+Poss+3P+Sg+Fem:óna		#;  !
ó+Prep+Poss+3P+Sg+Fem+NG:'na		#;  !
ó+Prep+Poss+3P+Sg+Masc:óna		#;  !
ó+Prep+Poss+3P+Sg+Masc+NG:'na		#;  !
ó+Prep+Poss+1P+Pl:ónár			#;  !

trí+Prep+Poss+3P+Sg+Fem:trína			#;  !
trí+Prep+Poss+3P+Sg+Masc:trína			#;  !
trí+Prep+Poss+3P+Pl:trína			#;  !
trí+Prep+Poss+1P+Pl:trínár			#;  !

! ALSO
! is used aspectually like tar éis 
arna+Prep+Cmpd:arna				#;  ! arna = iar n-a
!iar+Prep+Poss+3P+Sg+Fem:arna			#;  ! after his/her/their
!iar+Prep+Poss+3P+Sg+Masc:arna			#;  ! after his/her/their
!iar+Prep+Poss+3P+Pl:arna			#;  ! after his/her/their

go+Prep+Poss+3P+Sg+Fem:gona				#;
go+Prep+Poss+3P+Sg+Masc:gona				#;
go+Prep+Poss+3P+Pl:gona				#;
go+Prep+Poss+1P+Pl+NG:gonár			#;

!! COMPOUNDS: PREP + REL. PART. (a/ar)

i+Prep+Rel:ina				#;  !
i+Prep+Rel:inar				#;  !

faoi+Prep+Rel:faoina		#;  !
faoi+Prep+Rel:faoinar		#;  !

le+Prep+Rel+NG:le				#;  ! le n-a
le+Prep+Rel:lena			#;  ! 
le+Prep+Rel:lenar			#;  ! 

ó+Prep+Rel+NG:o				#;  ! o n-a
ó+Prep+Rel:óna				#;  ! 
ó+Prep+Rel:ónar				#;  ! 

trí+Prep+Rel:trína			#;  ! 
trí+Prep+Rel:trínar			#;  ! 


!
!! COMPOUND PREPOSITIONS: PREP + NOUN
!
!!<a r %  a g h a i d h %+Prep:0 %+Cmpd:0>  #; !! could be simp prep + noun
!!<a r %  c h ú l %+Prep:0 %+Cmpd:0>	#; !! could be simp prep + noun
!! Adverb <a r %_:%  a i s %+Prep:0 %+Cmpd:0>	#; !! 
<a r %_:%  f e a d h %+Prep:0 %+Cmpd:0>			#;
<a r %_:%  f u d %+Prep:0 %+Cmpd:0>				#;
<a r %_:%  l o r g %+Prep:0 %+Cmpd:0>				#;
<a r %_:%  n ó s %+Prep:0 %+Cmpd:0>				#;
<a r %_:%  s o n %+Prep:0 %+Cmpd:0>				#;

<d ' a i n n e o i n %+Prep:0 %+Cmpd:0>			#;
<d e %_:%  b h a r r %+Prep:0 %+Cmpd:0>			#;
<d e %_:%  c h o i s %+Prep:0 %+Cmpd:0>			#;
<d e %_:%  c h ó i r %+Prep:0 %+Cmpd:0>			#;
<d e %_:%  d h e a s c a %+Prep:0 %+Cmpd:0>		#;
<d e %_:%  d h e a s c a i b h %+Prep:0 %+Cmpd:0>		#;
<d e %_:%  d h í o b h á i l %+Prep:0 %+Cmpd:0>	#;
<d e %_:%  r é i r %+Prep:0 %+Cmpd:0>				#;
<d e %_:%  t h a i r b h e %+Prep:0 %+Cmpd:0>		#;

<f a o i %_:%  b h r á i d %+Prep:0 %+Cmpd:0>		#;
<f a o i %_:%  b h u n %+Prep:0 %+Cmpd:0>			#;
!!!<f a o i %_:%  c h e a n n %+Prep:0 %+Cmpd:0>		#;
<f a o i %_:%  c h o i n n e %+Prep:0 %+Cmpd:0>	#;
<f á %_:%  c h o i n n e %+CU:0 %+Prep:0 %+Cmpd:0>	#;  ! CU canúint Uladh
<f a o i %_:%  c h o m h a i r %+Prep:0 %+Cmpd:0>	#;
<f a o i %_:%  d h é i n %+Prep:0 %+Cmpd:0>		#;

<g o %_:%  c e a n n %+Prep:0 %+Cmpd:0>			#;
<g o %_:%  d t í %+Prep:0 %+Cmpd:0>				#;
<i %_:%  b h f e i g h i l %+Prep:0 %+Cmpd:0>		#;
!!<i %_:%  b h f i a n a i s e %+Prep:0 %+Cmpd:0>	#; ! does not need to govern an NP (e.g. like tar éis) therefore leave seperate 
<i %_:%  b h f o c h a i r %+Prep:0 %+Cmpd:0>		#;

<i %_:%  d t e a n n t a %+Prep:0 %+Cmpd:0>		#;
<i %_:%  g c i o n n %+Prep:0 %+Cmpd:0>			#;
<i %_:%  d t r á t h a %+Prep:0 %+Cmpd:0>		#;
<i %_:%  d t u i l l e a m a í %+Prep:0 %+Cmpd:0>	#;
<i %_:%  g c a i t h e a m h %+Prep:0 %+Cmpd:0>		#;
<i %_:%  g c e a n n %+Prep:0 %+Cmpd:0>			#;
<i %_:%  g c o i n n e %+Prep:0 %+Cmpd:0>		#;
<i %_:%  g c ó i r %+Prep:0 %+Cmpd:0> 			#;
<i %_:%  g c o m h a i r %+Prep:0 %+Cmpd:0> 		#;
<i %_:%  g c o s a m a r %+Prep:0 %+Cmpd:0> 		#;
<i %_:%  g c u i d e a c h t a %+Prep:0 %+Cmpd:0> 	#;

<i %_:%  l á r %+Prep:0 %+Cmpd:0>					#;
<i %_:%  l á t h a i r %+Prep:0 %+Cmpd:0>			#;

<i %_:%  m b u n %+Prep:0 %+Cmpd:0>				#;
<i %_:%  m e a s c %+Prep:0 %+Cmpd:0>				#;

<i %_:%  n d i a i d h %+Prep:0 %+Cmpd:0>			#;
<i %_:%  r i t h %+Prep:0 %+Cmpd:0>				#;

<i n %_:%  a n n %+Prep:0 %+Cmpd:0>		#;
<i n %_:%  a g h a i d h %+Prep:0 %+Cmpd:0>		#;
<i n %_:%  a i c e %+Prep:0 %+Cmpd:0>				#;
<i n %_:%  a i r i c i s %+Prep:0 %+Cmpd:0>		#;
!!<i n %  á i t %+Prep:0 %+Cmpd:0>				#;
<i n %_:%  é a d a n %+Prep:0 %+Cmpd:0>			#;
!!<i n %  i o n a d %+Prep:0 %+Cmpd:0>			#;

<l e %_:%  c o i s %+Prep:0 %+Cmpd:0>				#;
!!!<l e %  h a g h a i d h %+Prep:0 %+Cmpd:0>		#;	
<l e %_:%  g a i r i d %+Prep:0 %+Cmpd:0>				#;	
<l:L e %_:%  g a i r i d %+Prep:0 %+Cmpd:0>				#;	
<l e %_:%  h a i s %+Prep:0 %+Cmpd:0>				#;	
<l e %_:%  l i n n %+Prep:0 %+Cmpd:0>				#;	

<o s %_:%  c i o n n %+Prep:0 %+Cmpd:0>			#;
<o s %_:%  c o i n n e %+Prep:0 %+Cmpd:0>			#;
<o s %_:%  c o m h a i r %+Prep:0 %+Cmpd:0>		#;

<t a r %_:%  é i s %+Prep:0 %+Cmpd:0>				#;
<t h a r %_:%  c e a n n %+Prep:0 %+Cmpd:0>		#;	

<m a i d i r %_:%  l e %+Prep:0 %+CmpdNoGen:0>				#;
<m a i d i r %_:%  l e 0:i 0:s %+Prep:0 %+CmpdNoGen1:0>			#;
<m a i d i r %_:%  l e 0:n 0:a %+Prep:0 %+CmpdNoGen:0 %+Rel:0> 		#;
<m a i d i r %_:%  l e 0:n 0:a %+Prep:0 %+CmpdNoGen:0 %+Poss:0 %+3P:0 %+Pl:0> #;
<m a i d i r %_:%  l e 0:n 0:a %+Prep:0 %+CmpdNoGen:0 %+Poss:0 %+3P:0 %+Sg:0 %+Masc:0> #;
<m a i d i r %_:%  l e 0:n 0:a %+Prep:0 %+CmpdNoGen:0 %+Poss:0 %+3P:0 %+Sg:0 %+Fem:0> #;
<m a i d i r %_:%  l e:i 0:o 0:m %+Prep:0 %+CmpdNoGen:0>		#;
<m a i d i r %_:%  l e:i 0:o 0:m 0:s 0:a %+Prep:0 %+CmpdNoGen:0>	#;
<m a i d i r %_:%  l e 0:a 0:t %+Prep:0 %+CmpdNoGen:0>			#;
<m a i d i r %_:%  l e 0:a 0:t 0:s 0:a %+Prep:0 %+CmpdNoGen:0>		#;
<m a i d i r %_:%  l e:é 0:i %+Prep:0 %+CmpdNoGen:0>			#;
<m a i d i r %_:%  l e:i 0:n 0:n %+Prep:0 %+CmpdNoGen:0>		#;
<m a i d i r %_:%  l e:i 0:n 0:n 0:e %+Prep:0 %+CmpdNoGen:0>		#;
<m a i d i r %_:%  l e:i 0:b 0:h %+Prep:0 %+CmpdNoGen:0>		#;
<m a i d i r %_:%  l e:i 0:b 0:h 0:s 0:e %+Prep:0 %+CmpdNoGen:0>	#;
<m a i d i r %_:%  l e 0:o %+Prep:0 %+CmpdNoGen:0>			#;
<m a i d i r %_:%  l e 0:o 0:s 0:a 0:n %+Prep:0 %+CmpdNoGen:0>		#;
<m a i d i r %_:%  l e 0:n 0:á 0:r %+Prep:0 %+CmpdNoGen:0>		#;
<m a i d i r %_:%  l e 0:n 0:a 0:r %+Prep:0 %+CmpdNoGen:0>		#;
